Massachusetts, session 194th, H2174.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 108A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “service”, in line 12, the
following words:- ; provided, that such salaries comply with section 1 of chapter 151.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 151 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “employer”, in line 2, the following words:- , including
municipal governments,.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “otherwise”, in line 26, the following words:- , including municipal
governments.
of 1